Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Interstate Compact on Juveniles

§§ 43-25-1 through 43-25-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2009, ch. 366, § 2, effective July 1, 2009.

§43-25-1. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-3. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-5. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 2A, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-7. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 2B, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-9. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-11. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-06; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6,1958).]

§43-25-13. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-07; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-15. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-08; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]

§43-25-17. [Codes, 1942, § 7186-09; Laws, 1958, ch. 289, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).]